New Jersey, session 222, S410.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 2 of P.L.1999, c.15 (C.55:13A-7.17) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  Every unit of dwelling space in a hotel and multiple dwelling shall be equipped with one or more carbon monoxide sensor devices that bear the label of a nationally recognized testing laboratory and have been tested and listed as complying with the most recent Underwriters Laboratories standard 2034, or its equivalent, unless it is determined that no potential carbon monoxide hazard exists for that unit.  Any such installation or determination shall be made in accordance with the rules promulgated by the Commissioner of Community Affairs. b.    If a hotel or multiple dwelling in which a carbon monoxide sensor device is installed pursuant to subsection a. of this section, is also equipped with a monitored fire alarm system, then the hotel or multiple dwelling shall also be equipped with a monitored carbon monoxide alarm system. c.     As used in this section: Monitored fire alarm system means a fire detection or suppression system which, in addition to sounding a localized siren or alert, also transmits a notification to the local fire department or emergency services entity in order to provide an alert of a potential fire emergency, requiring response from the fire department or emergency services entity. Monitored carbon monoxide alarm system means a carbon monoxide sensor device which, in addition to sounding a localized siren or alert, also transmits a notification to the local fire department or emergency services entity in order to provide an alert of a potential carbon monoxide emergency, requiring response from the fire department or emergency services entity. (cf: P.L.1999, c.15, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the six month next following enactment.